Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2085
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Removal of directors by shareholders.

(1) The shareholders may remove one or more directors with or without cause unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

(2) If a director is elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the shareholders of that voting group may participate in the vote to remove him or her.

(3) A director may not be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect him or her under cumulative voting is voted against his or her removal. If cumulative voting is not authorized, a director may be removed only if the number of votes cast to remove him or her exceeds the number of votes cast not to remove him or her.

(4) A director may be removed by the shareholders only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director and the meeting notice shall state that the purpose or one of the purposes of the meeting is removal of the director.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 85.